Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2235.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 45.0135, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Assessment. Each insurer authorized to sell insurance in the state of Minnesota, including surplus lines carriers, and having Minnesota earned premium the previous calendar year shall remit an assessment to the commissioner for deposit in the insurance fraud prevention account on or before June 1 of each year. The amount of the assessment shall be based on the insurer's total assets and on the insurer's total written Minnesota premium, for the preceding fiscal year, as reported pursuant to section 60A.13. deleted text begin Beginning with the payment due on or before June 1, 2024,deleted text end The assessment amount is: Total Assets Assessment Less than $100,000,000 $ 400 $100,000,000 to $1,000,000,000 $ 1,500 Over $1,000,000,000 $ 4,000 Minnesota Written Premium Assessment Less than $10,000,000 $ 400 $10,000,000 to $100,000,000 $ 1,500 Over $100,000,000 $ 4,000 For purposes of this subdivision, the following entities are not considered to be insurers authorized to sell insurance in the state of Minnesota: risk retention groups; or township mutuals organized under chapter 67A.